Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 13. Distributions

§ 17-19-1301.
Prohibited distributions.

Except as authorized by W.S.

17-19-1302

, a corporation shall not make any distributions.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1302.
Purchase of memberships; authorized distributions.

A mutual benefit corporation may purchase its memberships if after the purchase is completed:

The corporation would be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its activities; and

The corporation’s total assets would at least equal the sum of its total liabilities.

Corporations may make distributions upon dissolution in conformity with article 14 of this act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to purchase of memberships generally, see §

17-19-622

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).